Florida, session 2026, SB1222.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 17 18 Section 1.âSection 395.3011, Florida Statutes, is amended 19 to read: 20 395.3011âBilling and collection activities.â 21 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 22 (a)ââExtraordinary collection actionâ means any of the 23 following actions taken by a licensed facility against an 24 individual in relation to obtaining payment of a bill for care: 25 1.(a)âSelling the individualâs debt to another party, 26 except if, before the sale, the medical creditor has entered 27 into a legally binding written agreement with the medical debt 28 collector which includes all of the following terms: 29 a.âProhibits the medical debt collector from engaging in 30 any prohibited collection action as specified in subsection (2); 31 b.âProhibits the medical debt collector from charging 32 interest on the debt in excess of that authorized under 33 subsection (4); 34 c.âAllows the debt to be returned or recalled by the 35 medical debt creditor upon a determination by the medical debt 36 creditor or medical debt collector that the debtor is eligible 37 for financial assistance; and 38 d.âIf the debtor is determined to be eligible for financial 39 assistance and the debt is not returned to or recalled by the 40 medical debt creditor, requires the medical debt collector to 41 adhere to procedures specified in the agreement which ensure 42 that the debtor does not pay, and has no obligation to pay, the 43 medical debt collector and the medical debt creditor, in total, 44 more than he or she is personally responsible for paying in 45 compliance with the law. 46 2.âFiling a debt collection lawsuit. 47 (b)ââMedical debt collectorâ means a third party, separate 48 from the medical debt creditor, that is hired to recoup, or is 49 sold, unpaid medical bills. 50 (c)ââMedical debt creditorâ means the party that is owed 51 money for medical services. 52 (2)âA medical debt creditor or medical debt collector may 53 not engage in any of the following activities to collect debts 54 owed for health care services: 55 (a)âCausing or threatening an individualâs arrest. 56 (b)âCausing or threatening an individual to be subject to a 57 writ of body attachment or similar instrument of law. 58 (c)âObtaining or threatening to obtain a lien on an 59 individualâs real property. 60 (d)âForeclosing or threatening to foreclose on an 61 individualâs real property. 62 (e)âGarnishing or threatening to garnish wages or state 63 income tax refunds. 64 (f)âUsing state or federal tax offsets to seize tax refunds 65 or tax credits. 66 (g)âAttaching, seizing, or threatening to attach or seize a 67 consumerâs bank account. 68 (h)âFurnishing or threatening to furnish information about 69 the medical debt to a consumer reporting agency Reporting 70 adverse information about the individual to consumer credit 71 reporting agencies or credit bureaus. 72 (c)âDeferring, denying, or requiring a payment before 73 providing medically necessary care because of the individualâs 74 nonpayment of one or more bills for previously provided care 75 covered under the facilityâs financial assistance policy. 76 (d)âActions that require a legal or judicial process, 77 including, but not limited to: 78 1.âPlacing a lien on the individualâs property; 79 2.âForeclosing on the individualâs real property; 80 3.âAttaching or seizing the individualâs bank account or 81 any other personal property; 82 4.âCommencing a civil action against the individual; 83 5.âCausing the individualâs arrest; or 84 6.âGarnishing the individualâs wages. 85 (3)(2)âA facility may not engage in an extraordinary 86 collection action against an individual to obtain payment for 87 services: 88 (a)âBefore the facility has made reasonable efforts to 89 determine whether the individual is eligible for assistance 90 under its financial assistance policy for the care provided and, 91 if eligible, before a decision is made by the facility on the 92 patientâs application for such financial assistance. 93 (b)âBefore the facility has provided the individual with an 94 itemized statement or bill. 95 (c)âDuring an ongoing grievance process as described in s. 96 395.301(6) or an ongoing appeal of a claim adjudication. 97 (d)âBefore billing any applicable insurer and allowing the 98 insurer to adjudicate a claim. 99 (e)âFor 30 days after notifying the patient in writing, by 100 certified mail, or by other traceable delivery method, that a 101 collection action will commence absent additional action by the 102 patient. This paragraph does not apply to a sale of debt 103 governed by a contract executed by the facility, which provides 104 that the debt may not incur interest or fees and that no other 105 extraordinary collection actions are taken by the purchaser of 106 the debt which could otherwise be taken by the licensed 107 facility, as described in subsection (1), and that the debt will 108 be returned to the facility if the debt buyer determines the 109 individual is eligible for assistance under the facilityâs 110 financial assistance policy. 111 (f)âWhile the individual: 112 1.âNegotiates in good faith the final amount of a bill for 113 services rendered; or 114 2.âComplies with all terms of a payment plan with the 115 facility. 116 (4)(a)âUnless a debtor is eligible for financial 117 assistance, and notwithstanding any agreement to the contrary, 118 interest on medical debt may not exceed 2 percent per annum. 119 Debtors eligible for financial assistance may not be charged any 120 interest or late fees. 121 (b)âThe rate of interest provided in paragraph (a) also 122 applies to any judgments on medical debt, notwithstanding any 123 agreement to the contrary. 124 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.